apertium-slk/apertium-slk.slk.dix
    <pardef n="ja/kýkoli__prn">
      <e><p><l>kýkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kéhokoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kéhokoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kémukoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýmkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kémkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kékoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cíkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýchkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýmkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýmikoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýchkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kéhokoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kémukoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýmkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kémkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kékoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kíkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýchkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýmkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýmikoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýchkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>koukoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kákoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kékoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kékoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>koukoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kékoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kékoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kékoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýchkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýmkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýmikoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýchkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kékoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kékoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kéhokoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kémukoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýmkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kémkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kákoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kákoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýchkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýmkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýmikoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kýchkoli</l><r>kýkoli<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="jakýkoli"><i>ja</i><par n="ja/kýkoli__prn"/></e>
